en: E459, Beta-cyclodextrine
xx: E459
ar: E459, بيتا سيكلودكسترين
az: E459, Beta-Siklodekstrin
bg: E459, Бета-циклодекстрин
ca: E459, β-ciclodextrina
cs: E459, Beta-cyklodextrin
da: E459, Beta-cyclodextrin
de: E459, Beta-Cyclodextrin
el: E459, Βήτα-κυκλοδεξτρίνη
eo: E459, Beta-ciklodekstrino
es: E459, Beta-ciclodextrina
et: E459, Beeta-tsüklodekstriin
fi: E459, Beeta-syklodekstriini, Beeta-syklodekstriiniä
fr: E459, Béta-cyclodextrine
hr: E459, Beta-ciklodekstrin
hu: E459, béta-ciklodextrin
it: E459, Beta-ciclodestrina
ja: E459, ベータ-シクロデキストリン
ko: E459, 베타-사이클로덱스트린
lt: E459, Beta-ciklodekstrinas
lv: E459, Beta-ciklodekstrīns
mt: E459, Beta-ċiklodextrin
nl: E459, Beta-cyclodextrine
pl: E459, Beta-cyklodekstryna
pt: E459, Beta-ciclodextrina
ro: E459, Beta-ciclodextrină
ru: E459, Бета-циклодекстрин
sk: E459, Beta-cyklodextrín
sl: E459, Beta-ciklodekstrin
sv: E459, Beta-cyklodextrin
tr: E459, Beta-Siklodekstrin
zh: E459, β-环糊精

en: E460, Cellulose, cellulose powder to prevent caking, cellulose powder added to prevent caking
xx: E460
af: E460, Sellulose
ar: E460, سليولوز
az: E460, Sellüloza
be: E460, Цэлюлоза
bg: E460, Целулоза
bn: E460, সেলুলোজ
bs: E460, Celuloza
ca: E460, Cel·lulosa, cellulosa
cs: E460, Celulóza
cy: E460, Seliwlos
da: E460, Cellulose
de: E460, Cellulose
el: E460, Κυτταρίνη
eo: E460, celulozo
es: E460, Celulosas
et: E460, Tselluloos
eu: E460, zelulosa
fa: E460, سلولز
fi: E460, Selluloosa, Selluloosaa
fr: E460, cellulose
ga: E460, ceallalós
gl: E460, Celulosa
he: E460, सेल्यूलोज़
hr: E460, Celuloza
ht: E460, Seliloz
hu: E460, Cellulóz
hy: E460, Բջջանյութ
id: E460, Selulosa
ie: E460, Cellulose
io: E460, Celuloso
is: E460, Sellulósi
it: E460, cellulosa
ja: E460, セルロース
ka: E460, ცელულოზა
kk: E460, Жасұнық
ko: E460, 셀룰로스
ku: E460, Seluloz
lt: E460, Celiuliozė
lv: E460, Celuloze
mk: E460, целулоза
ml: E460, സെല്ലുലോസ്
mr: E460, सेल्युलोज
ms: E460, Selulosa
mt: E460, ċelluloża
my: E460, ဆဲလျူလို့
nb: E460, cellulose
nl: E460, cellulose
oc: E460, Cellulòsa
pa: E460, ਸੈਲੂਲੋਜ਼
pl: E460, Celuloza
pt: E460, Celulose
qu: E460, Silulusa
ro: E460, Celuloză
ru: E460, целлюлоза
sh: E460, Celuloza
sk: E460, Celulóza
sl: E460, Celuloza
sq: E460, Celuloza
sr: E460, целулоза
su: E460, Selulosa
sv: E460, Cellulosa
sw: E460, Selulosi
ta: E460, மாவியம்
th: E460, เซลลูโลส
tr: E460, Selüloz
tt: E460, Tsellüloza
uk: E460, Целюлоза
vi: E460, Cellulose
zh: E460, 纤维素

en: E460(i), Microcrystalline cellulose
xx: E460(i)
bg: E460(i), Микрокристална целулоза
cs: E460(i), Mikrokrystalická celulosa
da: E460(i), Mikrokrystallinsk cellulose
de: E460(i), Mikrokristalline Cellulose
el: E460(i), Μικροκρυσταλλικη κυτταρινη
es: E460(i), Celulosa microcristalina
et: E460(i), Mikrokristalne tselluloos
fi: E460(i), Mikrokiteinen selluloosa, Mikrokiteistä selluloosaa
fr: E460(i), Cellulose microcristalline, cellulose microcrystalline
hu: E460(i), Mikrokristályos cellulóz
it: E460(i), Cellulosa microcristallina
lt: E460(i), Mikrokristalinė celiuliozė
lv: E460(i), Mikrokristāliskā celuloze
mt: E460(i), Ċelluloża mikrokristallina
nb: E460(i), Mikrokrystallinsk cellulose
nl: E460(i), Microkristallijne cellulose
pl: E460(i), Celuloza mikrokrystaliczna
pt: E460(i), Celulose microcristalina
ro: E460(i), Celuloză microcristalină
sk: E460(i), Mikrokryštalická celulóza
sl: E460(i), Mikrokristalna celuloza
sv: E460(i), Mikrokristallin cellulosa

en: E460(ii), Powdered cellulose, Purified cellulose
xx: E460(ii)
bg: E460(ii), Целулоза на прах
cs: E460(ii), Prášková celulosa
da: E460(ii), Cellulosepulver
de: E460(ii), Cellulosepulver, Gereinigte
el: E460(ii), Κονιοποιημενη κυτταρινη
es: E460(ii), Celulosa en polvo
et: E460(ii), Pulbertselluloos
fi: E460(ii), Selluloosajauhe, Selluloosajauhetta
fr: E460(ii), Cellulose en poudre
hu: E460(ii), Porított cellulóz
it: E460(ii), Cellulosa in polvere
lt: E460(ii), Miltelinė celiuliozė
lv: E460(ii), Celulozes pulveris
mt: E460(ii), Trab taċ-ċelluloża, Iċ-ċelluloża purifikata, mekkanikament disintegrata
nl: E460(ii), Cellulose in poedervorm
pl: E460(ii), Celuloza sproszkowana, Oczyszczona
pt: E460(ii), Celulose em pó
ro: E460(ii), Celuloză pulbere
sk: E460(ii), Prášková celulóza
sl: E460(ii), uprašena, čiščena, mehanično razgrajena celuloza, pripravljena iz alfaceluloze
sv: E460(ii), Cellulosapulver, Renad

en: E461, methyl cellulose, methylcellulose
xx: E461
ar: E461, ميثيل السليولوز
bg: E461, Метил целулоза
ca: E461, Metilcel·lulosa, metilcellulosa
cs: E461, Methylcelulóza, metylcelulóza
da: E461, methylcellulose
de: E461, Methylcellulose
el: E461, Μεθυλοκυτταρινη
es: E461, Metilcelulosa
et: E461, Metüültselluloos
fa: E461, متیل سلولز
fi: E461, Metyyliselluloosa, Metyyliselluloosaa
fr: E461, méthylcellulose
ga: E461, ceallalós carbocsaimeitile
hr: E461, metilceluloza, metil celuloza
hu: E461, Metil-cellulóz
it: E461, Metilcellulosa
ja: E461, メチルセルロース
lt: E461, Metilceliuliozė
lv: E461, Metilceluloze
mt: E461, Ċelluloża metilika
nl: E461, Methylcellulose
pl: E461, Metyloceluloza
pt: E461, Metilcelulose
ro: E461, Metilceluloză
ru: E461, метилцеллюлоза
sk: E461, Metyloceluloza
sl: E461, Metilceluloza
sv: E461, Metylcellulosa
uk: E461, Метилцелюлоза

en: E462, Ethyl cellulose, Ethylcellulose
xx: E462
bg: E462, Етил целулоза
ca: E462, Etilcel·lulosa
cs: E462, Ethylcelulosa, Ethylcelulóza, Etylcelulosa, Etylcelulóza
da: E462, Ethylcellulose
de: E462, Ethylcellulose
el: E462, Αιθυλοκυτταρινη
es: E462, Etilcelulosa
et: E462, Etüültselluloos
fi: E462, Etyyliselluloosa, Etyyliselluloosaa
fr: E462, Éthylcellulose
hu: E462, Etil-cellulóz, Etilcellulóz
it: E462, Etilcellulosa
lt: E462, Etilceliuliozė
lv: E462, Etilceluloze
mt: E462, Ċelluloża etilika
nl: E462, Ethylcellulose
pl: E462, Etyloceluloza
pt: E462, Etilcelulose
ro: E462, Etilceluloză
sk: E462, Etylcelulóza
sl: E462, Etilceluloza
sv: E462, Etylcellulosa

en: E463, Hydroxypropyl cellulose, Hydroxypropylcellulose
xx: E463
bg: E463, Хидроксипропил целулоза
ca: E463, Hidroxipropilcel·lulosa
cs: E463, Hydroxypropylcelulosa
da: E463, Hydroxypropylcellulose
de: E463, Hydroxypropylcellulose
el: E463, Υδροξυπροπυλοκυτταρινη
es: E463, Hidroxipropilcelulosa
et: E463, Hüdroksüpropüültselluloos
fi: E463, Hydroksipropyyliselluloosa, Hydroksipropyyliselluloosaa
fr: E463, Hydroxypropylcellulose
hr: E463, hidroksipropil celuloza
hu: E463, Hidroxi-propil-cellulóz, Hidroxipropil-cellulóz
it: E463, Idrossipropilcellulosa
lt: E463, Hidroksipropilceliuliozė
lv: E463, Hidroksipropilceluloze
mt: E463, Ċelluloża idrossipropilika
nl: E463, Hydroxypropylcellulose
pl: E463, Hydroksypropyloceluloza
pt: E463, Hidroxipropilcelulose
ro: E463, Hidroxipropilceluloză
sk: E463, Hydroxypropylcelulóza
sl: E463, Hidroksipropil celuloza
sv: E463, Hydroxipropylcellulosa

en: E464, Hydroxypropyl methyl cellulose, hypromellose, hydroxypropyl methylcellulose, HPMC, hydroxypropylmethylcellulose, hydroxy propyl methyl cellulose
xx: E464
ar: E464, هيدروكسي بروبيل ميثيل سيللوز
bg: E464, Хидроксипропил метил целулоза
ca: E464, Hidroxipropilmetilcel·lulosa
cs: E464, Hydroxypropylmethylcelulosa
da: E464, Hydroxypropylmethylcellulose, Hypromellose
de: E464, Hydroxypropylmethylcellulose, Methylhydroxypropylcellulose, Hydroxypropylmethylzellulose, Hypromellose, HPMC
el: E464, Υδροξυπροπυλομεθυλοκυτταρινη
es: E464, Hidroxipropilmetilcelulosa, Hipromelosa, HPMC
et: E464, Hüdroksüpropüülmetüültselluloos
fa: E464, اشک مصنوعی
fi: E464, Hydroksipropyylimetyyliselluloosa, Hydroksipropyylimetyyliselluloosaa
fr: E464, Hydroxypropylméthylcellulose, Hypromellose, Hydroxypropyl methyl cellulose, Hydroxypropyl methylcellulose, HPMC, Cellulose hydroxypropyl methyl ether, Methylhydroxypropylcellulosum
hr: E464, hidroksipropil metil celuloza, hidroksipropilmetilirana celuloza
hu: E464, Hidroxi-propil-metil-cellulóz, Hidroxipropil-metilcellulóz
id: E464, Hydroxypropyl methylcellulose
it: E464, Idrossipropilmetilcellulosa
ja: E464, ヒプロメロース
ko: E464, 하이프로멜로스
lt: E464, Hidroksipropilmetilceliuliozė
lv: E464, Hidroksipropilmetilceluloze
mk: E464, Хипермелоза
mt: E464, Ċelluloża metilika idrossipropilika
nl: E464, Hydroxypropylmethylcellulose, Hypromellose
pl: E464, Hydroksypropylometyloceluloza, hypermyloza, Hipromeloza, hypromeloza, HPMC
pt: E464, Hidroxipropilmetilcelulose, Hipromelose
ro: E464, Hidroxipropilmetilceluloză
ru: E464, Метилоксипропилцеллюлоза
sh: E464, Hipromeloza
sk: E464, Hydroxypropylmetylcelulóza
sl: E464, Hidroksipropilmetil celuloza
sr: E464, Hipromeloza
sv: E464, Hydroxipropylmetylcellulosa
zh: E464, 羟丙甲纤维素

en: E465, Ethyl methyl cellulose, Ethylmethylcellulose
xx: E465
bg: E465, Етил метил целулоза
ca: E465, Etilmetilcel·lulosa
cs: E465, Ethylmethylcelulosa
da: E465, Ethylmethylcellulose
de: E465, Ethylmethylcellulose
el: E465, Αιθυλομεθυλοκυτταρινη
es: E465, Etilmetilcelulosa
et: E465, Etüülmetüültselluloos
fi: E465, Metyylietyyliselluloosa, Metyylietyyliselluloosaa
fr: E465, Éthylméthylcellulose, Méthyléthylcellulose, Méthyl-éthyl-cellulose
hu: E465, Etil-metil-cellulóz
it: E465, Etilmetilcellulosa
lt: E465, Etilmetilceliuliozė
lv: E465, Etilmetilceluloze
mt: E465, Ċelluloża etilmetilika
nl: E465, Ethylmethylcellulose
pl: E465, Etylometyloceluloza
pt: E465, Etilmetilcelulose
ro: E465, Etilmetilceluloză
sk: E465, Etylmetylcelulóza
sl: E465, Etilmetil celuloza
sv: E465, Metyletylcellulosa

en: E466, Sodium carboxy methyl cellulose, sodium carboxymethylcellulose, carboxy methyl cellulose, Carboxymethylcellulose, cellulose gum, carboxymethyl cellulose, CMC, NaCMC
xx: E466
ar: E466, كربوكسي ميثيل السليولوز
bg: E466, Натриева карбокси метил целулоза, карбокси метил целулоза, целулозна гума, CMC, NaCMC
ca: E466, Carboximetil cel·lulosa sòdica, Carboximetil cel·lulosa, Carboximetilcellulosa sòdica
cs: E466, Sodná sůl karboxymethylcelulosy, karboxymethylcelulosa, celulosová guma, CMC, NaCMC, Karboxymethylcelulóza, Karboxymetylcelulóza, Karboxymetylcelulosa, E 466
da: E466, Natriumcarboxymethylcellulose, carboxymethylcellulose, Cellulosegummi
de: E466, Carboxymethylcellulose, natrium-carboxymethylcellulose, cellulosegummi, CMC, NaCMC, Carboxymethylcellulosen, Carboxymethylzellulose, E 466, Natriumcarboxymethylcellulose
el: E466, Αλας με νατριο της καρβοξυμεθυλοκυτταρινης, καρβοξυμεθυλοκυτταρινη, κομμι κυτταρινης, CMC, NaCMC, καρβοξυμεθυλοκυτταρινη
es: E466, Carboximetilcelulosa sódica, carboximetil celulosa de sodio, carboximetilcelulosa, carboximetil celulosa, goma de celulosa, CMC, NaCMC, gomas de celulosa, CMC sódica
et: E466, Naatriumkarboksümetüültselluloos, Karboksümetüültselluloos
fa: E466, کربوکسی متیل سلولز
fi: E466, Karboksimetyyliselluloosa, Natriumkarboksimetyyliselluloosa, CMC, selluloosakumi, Karboksimetyyliselluloosaa, Natriumkarboksimetyyliselluloosaa, selluloosakumia
fr: E466, Carboxyméthylcellulose, Gomme cellulosique, CMC sodique, CMC, Carboxyméthylcellulose sodique, Carboxyméthylcellulose de sodium, Carboxyméthyl-cellulose sodique, Gomme de cellulose, Gommes de cellulose, épaississant 466, NaCMC, Carboxyméthyl cellulose, Carmellose sodique, Carboxyle méthyle cellulose
hr: E466, karboksi metil celuloza, celulozna guma, natrij karboksimetil celuloza, natrijeva karboksi metil celuloza
hu: E466, Nátrium-karboxi-metil-cellulóz, karboxi-metil-cellulóz, cellulózgumi, CMC, NaCMC, Karboximetil-cellulóz
it: E466, Carbossimetilcellulosa sodica, carbossimetilcellulosa, gomma di cellulosa, CMC, NaCMC
ja: E466, カルボキシメチルセルロース
lt: E466, Natrio karboksimetilceliuliozė, karboksimetilceliuliozė, celiuliozės derva, CMC, NaCMC
lv: E466, Nātrija karboksimetilceluloze, karboksimetilceluloze, celulozes sveķi, CMC, NaCMC
mt: E466, Ċelluloża karbossimetilika tas-sodju, ċelluloża karbossimetilika, gomma taċ-ċelluloża, CMC, NaCMC
nl: E466, Natriumcarboxymethylcellulose, carboxymethylcellulose, cellulosegom, natriumcarboxylmethylcellulose
pl: E466, Sól sodowa karboksymetylocelulozy, karboksymetyloceluloza, guma celulozowa, CMC, NaCMC
pt: E466, Carboximetilcelulose de sódio, carboximetilcelulose, goma de celulose, CMC, NaCMC
ro: E466, Carboximetilceluloză de sodiu, carboximetilceluloză, gumă de celuloză, CMC, NaCMC
ru: E466, Карбоксиметилцеллюлоза
sk: E466, Sodná soľ karboxymetylcelulózy, karboxymetylcelulóza, celulózová guma, CMC, NaCMC
sl: E466, Natrijeva karboksimetil celuloza, karboksimetil celuloza, celulozni gumi, CMC, NaCMC
sv: E466, Karboximetylcellulosa, natriumkarboximetylcellulosa, cellulosagummi, CMC, NaCMC
uk: E466, Карбоксиметилцелюлоза
zh: E466, 羧甲基纖維素

en: E467, Ethulose
xx: E467
af: E467, Etulose
ar: E467, إيثولوز
az: E467, Etuloz
bg: E467, Етулоза
ca: E467, Etulosa
cs: E467, Etulosa
da: E467, Etulose
de: E467, Ethulose
el: E467, Αιθυλόζη
es: E467, Etulosa
et: E467, Etuloos
fi: E467, Etyylihydroksietyyliselluloosa, Etyylihydroksietyyliselluloosaa
fr: E467, Ethyl-hydroxyéthyl-cellulose
hr: E467, Etuloza
hu: E467, etulóz
it: E467, Etulosio
ja: E467, エツロース
ko: E467, 에툴로스
lt: E467, Etuliozė
lv: E467, Etuloze
nl: E467, Ethulose
pl: E467, Etuloza
pt: E467, Etulose
ro: E467, Etuloză
ru: E467, Этулоза
sk: E467, Etulóza
sl: E467, Etuloza
sv: E467, Etulos
zh: E467, 乙基纤维素

en: E468, Cross-linked sodium carboxymethylcellulose, cross-linked cellulose gum, Crosslinked sodium carboxy methyl cellulose
xx: E468
bg: E468, Напречно свързана натриева карбоксиметил целулоза, напречно свързана целулозна гума
ca: E468
cs: E468, Zesíťovaná sodná sůl karboxymethylcelulosy, zesíťovaná celulosová guma
da: E468, Tværbunden natriumcarboxymethylcellulose (tværbunden cellulosegummi)
de: E468, Vernetzte carboxymethylcellulose, modifizierter cellulosegummi
el: E468, Αλας με νατριο της καρβοξυμεθυλοκυτταρινης με σταυροδεσμους, κομμι κυτταρινης με σταυροδεσμους
es: E468, Carboximetilcelulosa sódica entrelazada, goma de celulosa entrelazada
et: E468, Võrkstruktuuriga naatriumkarboksümetüültselluloos
fi: E468, Kroskarmelloosi, Silloitettu natriumkarboksimetyyliselluloosa, silloitettu selluloosakumi, Kroskarmelloosia, Silloitettua natriumkarboksimetyyliselluloosaa, silloitettua selluloosakumia
fr: E468, Carboxyméthylcellulose de sodium réticulée, gomme de cellulose réticulée, CMC réticulée
hu: E468, Térhálós nátrium-karboxi-metil-cellulóz, térhálós cellulózgumi
it: E468, Carbossimetilcellulosa sodica reticolata, gomma di cellulosa reticolata
lt: E468, Cross-linked sodium carboxymethylcellulose, cross-linked cellulose gum
lv: E468, Šķērsšūtā nātrija karboksimetilceluloze, šķērsšūtās celulozes sveķi
mt: E468, Karbossimetilċelluloża tas-sodju retikolata, gomma taċ-ċelluloża retikolata
nl: E468, Vernette natriumcarboxymethylcellulose, vernette cellulosegom
pl: E468, Sól sodowa karboksymetylcelulozy usieciowana, guma celulozowa usieciowana
pt: E468, Carboximetilcelulose de sódio reticulada, goma de celulose reticulada
ro: E468, Carboximetilceluloză de sodiu reticulată, gumă de celuloză cu structură reticulată
sk: E468, Sieťovaná karboxymetylcelulóza sodná, sieťovaná celulózová guma, Sieťovaná karboxymetylcelulóza, sieťovaná CMC
sl: E468, Zamrežena natrijeva karboksimetilceluloza, zamreženi celulozni gumi
sv: E468, Tvärbunden natriumkarboximetylcellulosa, tvärbundet cellulosagummi

en: E469, Enzymatically hydrolysed carboxymethylcellulose, enzymatically hydrolised cellulose gum
xx: E469
bg: E469, Ензимно хидролизирана карбоксиметил целулоза, ензимно хидролизирана целулозна гума
ca: E469, Carboximetilcel·lulosa hidrolitzada enzimàticament
cs: E469, Enzymově hydrolyzovaná karboxymethylcelulosa, enzymově hydrolyzovaná celulosová guma
da: E469, Enzymatisk hydroliseret carboxymethylcellulose (enzymatisk hydrolyseret cellulosegummi)
de: E469, Enzymatisch hydrolysierte carboxymethylcellulose, enzymatisch hydrolysierter cellulosegummi
el: E469, Ενζυμικα υδρολυμενη καρβοξυμεθυλοκυτταρινη, ενζυμικα υδρολυμενο κομμι κυτταρινησ
es: E469, Carboximetilcelulosa hidrolizada enzimáticamente, goma de celulosa hidrolizada enzimáticamente
et: E469, Ensümaatiliselt hüdrolüüsitud karboksümetüültselluloos
fi: E469, Entsymaattisesti hydrolysoitu karboksimetyyliselluloosa, entsymaattisesti hydrolysoitu selluloosakumi, Entsymaattisesti hydrolysoitua karboksimetyyliselluloosaa, entsymaattisesti hydrolysoitua selluloosakumia
fr: E469, Carboxyméthylcellulose hydrolysée de manière enzymatique, gomme de cellulose hydrolysée de manière enzymatique
hu: E469, Enzimesen hidrolizált karboxi-metil-cellulóz, enzimesen hidrolizált cellulózgumi
it: E469, Carbossimetilcellulosa idrolizzata enzimaticamente, gomma di cellulosa idrolizzata enzimaticamente
lt: E469, Fermentais hidrolizuota karboksimetilceliuliozė, fermentais hidrolizuota celiuliozės derva
lv: E469, Fermentatīvi hidrolizēta karboksimetilceluloze, fermentatīvi hidrolizēti celulozes sveķi
mt: E469, Karbossimetilċelluloża idrolizzata bl-enżimi, gomma taċ-ċelluloża idrolizzata bl-enżimi
nl: E469, Enzymatisch gehydrolyseerde carboxymethylcellulose, enzymatisch gehydrolyseerde cellulosegom
pl: E469, Enzymatycznie zhydrolizowana karboksymetyloceluloza, enzymatycznie zhydrolizowana guma celulozowa
pt: E469, Carboximetilcelulose hidrolisada enzimaticamente, goma de celulose hidrolisada enzimaticamente
ro: E469, Carboximetilceluloză hidrolizată enzimatic, gumă de celuloză hidrolizată enzimatic
sk: E469, Enzymaticky hydrolyzovaná karboxymetylcelulóza, enzymaticky hydrolyzovaná celulózová guma
sl: E469, Encimsko hidrolizirana karboksimetil celuloza, encimsko hidrolizirani celulozni gumi
sv: E469, Enzymatiskt hydrolyserad karboximetylcellulosa, enzymatiskt hydrolyserat cellulosagummi

en: E470, Sodium/potassium/calcium and magnesium salts of fatty acids
xx: E470
af: E470, Natrium/kalium/kalsium- en magnesiumsoute van vetsure
az: E470, Yağ turşularının natrium/kalium/kalsium və maqnezium duzları
bg: E470, Натриеви/калиеви/калциеви и магнезиеви соли на мастни киселини
ca: E470, Sal sòdica/potàssica/càlcica/magnèsica d'àcids grassos
cs: E470, Sodné/draselné/vápenaté a hořečnaté soli mastných kyselin
da: E470, Natrium/kalium/calcium- og magnesiumsalte af fedtsyrer
de: E470, Natrium- Kalium- Calcium- und Magnesiumsalze von Fettsäuren
el: E470, Άλατα νατρίου/καλίου/ασβεστίου και μαγνησίου λιπαρών οξέων
es: E470, Sales de sodio/potasio/calcio y magnesio de ácidos grasos
et: E470, Rasvhapete naatrium/kaalium/kaltsium- ja magneesiumisoolad
fi: E470, Rasvahappojen suolat, Rasvahappojen suoloja, Rasvahappojen natrium- kalium- kalsium- ja magnesiumsuolat
fr: E470, Sels de sodium/potassium/calcium d'acides gras, Sels de sodium potassium calcium et magnésium d'acides gras
hr: E470, natrijeve kalijeve i kalcijeve soli masnih kiselina, Natrijeve kalijeve kalcijeve i magnezijeve soli masnih kiselina
hu: E470, nátrium/kálium/kalcium és magnézium sók és zsírsavak, Zsírsavak nátrium- kálium- kalcium- és magnéziumsói
it: E470, Sali di sodio potassio calcio e magnesio degli acidi grassi
ja: E470, 脂肪酸のナトリウム/カリウム/カルシウム/マグネシウム塩
ko: E470, 지방산의 나트륨/칼륨/칼슘 및 마그네슘 염
lt: E470, Natrio kalio kalcio ir magnio riebalų rūgščių druskos
lv: E470, Taukskābju nātrija kālija kalcija un magnija sāļi
mk: E470, Натриумови калиумови калциумови и магнезиумови соли на масни киселини
mt: E470, Imħlieħ tas-sodju potassju kalċju u manjesju tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E470, Vetzuurzouten Natrium- kalium- calcium- en magnesiumzouten van vetzuren
pl: E470, Sole sodowe potasowe wapniowe i magnezowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E470, Sais de sódio potássio cálcio e magnésio de ácidos gordos
ro: E470, Săruri de sodiu potasiu calciu și magneziu ale acizilor grași
ru: E470, Натриевые калиевые кальциевые и магниевые соли жирных кислот
sk: E470, Sodné draselné vápenaté a horečnaté soli mastných kyselín
sl: E470, Natrijeve kalijeve kalcijeve in magnezijeve soli maščobnih kislin
sr: E470, Натријумове калијумове калцијумове и магнезијумове соли масних киселина
sv: E470, Natrium- kalium- kalcium- och magnesiumsalter av fettsyror
zh: E470, 脂肪酸的钠/钾/钙和镁盐

en: E470(i)
xx: E470(i)

en: E470(ii)
xx: E470(ii)

en: E470(iii)
xx: E470(iii)

en: E470a, Sodium/potassium and calcium salts of fatty acids, Sodium/potassium and calcium salts of fatty acids
xx: E470a
bg: E470a, Натриеви/калиеви и калциеви соли на мастни киселини
ca: E470a, Sal sòdica d'àcids grassos
cs: E470a, Sodné/draselné a vápenaté soli mastných kyselin
da: E470a, Natrium-/kalium- og calciumsalte af fedtsyrer
de: E470a, Natrium-/Kalium- und Calciumsalze der Speisefettsäuren
el: E470a, Αλατα λιπαρων οξεων με νατριο/καλιο και ασβεστιο
es: E470a, Sales sódicas/ potásicas y cálcicas de ácidos grasos
et: E470a, Rasvhapete naatrium-/kaalium- ja kaltsiumsoolad
fi: E470a, Rasvahappojen natrium-/kalium- ja kalsiumsuolat, Rasvahappojen natrium-/kalium- ja kalsiumsuoloja
fr: E470a, Stéarate de sodium/potassium/calcium, Stéarate de sodium, Stéarate de potassium, Stéarate de calcium, Sels de sodium de potassium et de calcium d'acides gras
hr: E470a
hu: E470a, Zsírsavak nátrium/-kálium- és kalciumsói
it: E470a, Sali di sodio/di potassio e di calcio degli acidi grassi
lt: E470a, Sodium/potassium and calcium salts of fatty acids
lv: E470a, Taukskābju nātrija/kālija un kalcija sāļi
mt: E470a, L-imlieħ tas-sodju/il-potassju u l-kalċju tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E470a, Natrium-/kalium- en calciumzouten van vetzuren
pl: E470a, Sole sodowe/potasowe i wapniowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E470a, Sais de sódio/potássio e cálcio de ácidos gordos
ro: E470a, Săruri de sodiu/potasiu și calciu ale acizilor grași
sk: E470a, Sodné/draselné a vápenaté soli mastných kyselín
sl: E470a, Natrijeve/kalijeve in kalcijeve soli maščobnih kislin
sv: E470a, Natrium-/kalium- och kalciumsalter av fettsyror

en: E470a(i), Sodium salts of fatty acids
xx: E470a(i)
ar: E470a(i), أملاح الصوديوم للأحماض الدهنية
az: E470a(i), Yağ turşularının natrium duzları
bg: E470a(i), Натриеви соли на мастни киселини
ca: E470a(i), Sals de sodi dels àcids grassos
cs: E470a(i), Sodné soli mastných kyselin
da: E470a(i), Natriumsalte af fedtsyrer
de: E470a(i), Natriumsalze der Speisefettsäuren
el: E470a(i), Άλατα νατρίου λιπαρών οξέων
eo: E470a(i), Natriaj saloj de grasacidoj
es: E470a(i), Sales de sodio de ácidos grasos
et: E470a(i), Rasvhapete naatriumsoolad
fi: E470a(i), Rasvahappojen natriumsuolat, Rasvahappojen natriumsuoloja
fr: E470a(i), Sels de sodium d'acides gras
ga: E470a(i), Salain sóidiam d'aigéid shailleacha
gl: E470a(i), Sales de sodio de ácidos graxos
he: E470a(i), מלחי נתרן של חומצות שומן
hi: E470a(i), वसा अम्ल के सोडियम लवण
hr: E470a(i), Natrijeve soli masnih kiselina
hu: E470a(i), Zsírsavak nátriumsói
id: E470a(i), Garam natrium asam lemak
it: E470a(i), Sali di sodio degli acidi grassi
ja: E470a(i), 脂肪酸ナトリウム塩
ko: E470a(i), 지방산의 나트륨 염
lt: E470a(i), Natrio riebalų rūgščių druskos
lv: E470a(i), Taukskābju nātrija sāļi
mk: E470a(i), Натриумови соли на масни киселини
ms: E470a(i), Garam natrium asid lemak
mt: E470a(i), Imħlieħ tas-sodju tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E470a(i), Natriumzouten van vetzuren
no: E470a(i), Natriumsalter av fettsyrer
pl: E470a(i), Sole sodowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E470a(i), Sais de sódio de ácidos gordos
ro: E470a(i), Săruri de sodiu ale acizilor grași
ru: E470a(i), Натриевые соли жирных кислот
sk: E470a(i), Sodné soli mastných kyselín
sl: E470a(i), Natrijeve soli maščobnih kislin
sq: E470a(i), Kripërat e natriumit të acideve yndyrore
sr: E470a(i), Натријумове соли масних киселина
sv: E470a(i), Natriumsalter av fettsyror
th: E470a(i), เกลือโซเดียมของกรดไขมัน
tr: E470a(i), Yağ asitlerinin sodyum tuzları
uk: E470a(i), Натрієві солі жирних кислот
zh: E470a(i), 脂肪酸的钠盐

en: E470a(ii), Potassium salts of fatty acids
xx: E470a(ii)
de: E470a(ii), Kaliumsalze der Speisefettsäuren
fi: E470a(ii), Rasvahappojen kaliumsuolat, Rasvahappojen kaliumsuoloja
fr: E470a(ii), Sels de potassium d'acides gras
hu: E470a(ii), Zsírsavak káliumsói
it: E470a(ii), Sali di potassio degli acidi grassi
ja: E470a(ii), 脂肪酸カリウム塩
ko: E470a(ii), 지방산 칼륨 염
lt: E470a(ii), Kalio riebalų rūgščių druskos
lv: E470a(ii), Kālija taukskābju sāļi
pl: E470a(ii), Sole potasowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E470a(ii), Sais de potássio de ácidos gordos
ro: E470a(ii), Săruri de potasiu ale acizilor grași
ru: E470a(ii), Калийные соли жирных кислот
sk: E470a(ii), Draselné soli mastných kyselín
sl: E470a(ii), Kalijeve soli maščobnih kislin
sv: E470a(ii), Kaliumsalter av fettsyror
zh: E470a(ii), 脂肪酸钾盐